Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-442
Alternative methods for assessing compliance.

In addition to or in lieu of the authority to inspect for purposes of licensure and renewal, the department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which permit the use of alternative methods for assessing the compliance by a health care facility or health care service with the Health Care Facility Licensure Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 42.